Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-1509
Acquisition by bank holding company; prohibited; exceptions.

A bank holding company shall not acquire, hold, or operate a financial institution acquired under sections 8-1506 to 8-1510 or section 8-1516 located in this state as a nonbank subsidiary under section 4 of the federal Bank Holding Company Act of 1956, as amended, unless such financial institution is a savings association as defined by section 2(j) of the federal Bank Holding Company Act of 1956, as amended. The Director of Banking and Finance shall not either accept or approve an application for acquisition under sections 8-1506 to 8-1510 or section 8-1516 which contains as a term or condition thereof the approval of the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System under section 4(c)(8) of the federal Bank Holding Company Act of 1956, as amended, unless such financial institution is a savings association as defined by section 2(j) of the federal Bank Holding Company Act of 1956, as amended.

Laws 1983, LB 241, § 4;

Laws 1990, LB 956, § 15;

Laws 1996, LB 1275, § 5.